inc/verb_inner_affixes.lexc
LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ís    #; ! 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@ís    #; ! 

LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yis   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;

LEXICON yis-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yís   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #; !  CHECKME
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@gás   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@gás   #;


LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-NoPrefix
! FIXME: no documentation for this form; dummy values below
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@áá    #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@áá    #;

LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-InnerPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #; 
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #;  
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #;  

LEXICON yii-POT-AFF-OuterPrefix
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yis   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yíí   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@yii   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yaà   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yiì   #;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@yas   #;
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@íí    #; 
@R.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@R.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@íí    #; 
